Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1119.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7 of the act of January 14, 1952 (1951 P.L.1898, No.522), known as the Funeral Director Law, is amended to read:Section 7. Restrictions; Preparation Room.--Original licenses under this act (1) shall be granted only to individuals, partnerships or corporations, (2) shall specify by name the person, partnership or corporation to whom they are issued, and (3) shall designate the particular place approved by the board at which the profession of funeral directing shall be 123456789101112131415161718192021 carried on. A license shall authorize the conduct of the profession at the particular place of practice designated therein and no other, and only by the particular person, partnership or corporation designated. This provision shall not prevent a person licensed for the practice of funeral directing from assisting another duly licensed person, partnership or corporation in the conduct of the profession in an approved funeral establishment nor shall it prevent a person licensed for the practice of the profession from conducting a funeral at a church, a private residence of the deceased, or an approved funeral establishment provided such person maintains a fixed place or establishment of his own approved by the board.A licensed funeral director, partnership or corporation may move to a new place of practice, which shall be registered and approved by the board if the new place of practice meets all the requirements as set forth in the State Board's Rules and Regulations.After the thirty-first day of August, one thousand nine hundred fifty-two, every establishment in which the profession of funeral directing is carried on shall include a preparation room, containing instruments and supplies necessary for the preparation and embalming of dead human bodies and be constructed in accordance with sanitary standards prescribed by the board, for the protection of the public health.All areas within an approved establishment must be maintained in a proper and sanitary manner, as determined by the board or State and local ordinances wherever they apply, for the protection of the public.[No food or intoxicating beverages shall be served in any funeral establishment in which the profession of funeral 20250SB1119PN1365 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 directing is carried on. Beverages, if served, must be restricted to a separate room not used for the preparation and conduct of a funeral service. Any facility beyond the confines of such funeral establishment, but directly or indirectly operated by a funeral director for the service of refreshments or food shall be maintained in accordance with State and local health laws and regulations pertaining to public eating places for the protection of the public.] No funeral establishment shall prepare on or about the premises of the establishment any food in conjunction with any funeral or in conjunction with any service offered or provided for the preparation and disposal of dead human bodies. A funeral establishment may provide, distribute or permit persons attending a funeral or other service, or making funeral arrangements, to distribute and consume food and beverages on or about the premises of the establishment if the establishment complies with applicable State and local health and sanitation requirements and food and beverages are not stored, prepared, distributed or consumed in areas in which dead human bodies are stored or prepared.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1119PN1365 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920